Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE D. PREVENTION, CONTROL, AND REPORTS OF DISEASES; PUBLIC HEALTH DISASTERS AND EMERGENCIES

CHAPTER 86. BREAST CANCER AND LUNG CANCER

SUBCHAPTER B. BREAST CANCER SCREENING

Sec. 86.013. INFORMATION ON SUPPLEMENTAL BREAST CANCER SCREENING. (a) On completion of a mammogram, a mammography facility certified by the United States Food and Drug Administration or by a certification agency approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration shall provide to the patient the following notice:

"If your mammogram demonstrates that you have dense breast tissue, which could hide abnormalities, and you have other risk factors for breast cancer that have been identified, you might benefit from supplemental screening tests that may be suggested by your ordering physician.

"Dense breast tissue, in and of itself, is a relatively common condition. Therefore, this information is not provided to cause undue concern, but rather to raise your awareness and to promote discussion with your physician regarding the presence of other risk factors, in addition to dense breast tissue.

"A report of your mammography results will be sent to you and your physician. You should contact your physician if you have any questions or concerns regarding this report."

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, this section does not create a cause of action or create a standard of care, obligation, or duty that provides a basis for a cause of action.

(c) The information required by this section or evidence that a person violated this section is not admissible in a civil, judicial, or administrative proceeding.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (H.B. 2102), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.